Illinois, session 104th, SB1650.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-12 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1-12)7    Sec. 1-12. Public university voting. 8    (a) Each appropriate election authority shall, in addition 9to the early voting conducted at locations otherwise required 10by law, conduct early voting, grace period registration, and 11grace period voting at the student union on the campus of a 12public university within the election authority's 13jurisdiction. The voting required by this subsection (a) to be 14conducted on campus must be conducted from the 6th day before a 15general primary or general election through until and 16including the 4th day before a general primary or general 17election from 10:00 a.m. to 5:00 5 p.m., must be conducted on 18the day of a general primary or general election from 6:00 a.m. 19to 7:00 p.m., and must be conducted as otherwise required by 20Article 19A of this Code. The , except that the voting required 21by this subsection (a) need not be conducted during a 22consolidated primary or consolidated election. If an election 23authority has voting equipment that can accommodate a ballot   SB1650- 2 -LRB104 10590 SPS 20666 b1in every form required in the election authority's 2jurisdiction, then the election authority shall extend early 3voting and grace period registration and voting under this 4Section to any registered voter in the election authority's 5jurisdiction. However, if the election authority does not have 6voting equipment that can accommodate a ballot in every form 7required in the election authority's jurisdiction, then the 8election authority may limit early voting and grace period 9registration and voting under this Section to voters in 10precincts where the public university is located and precincts 11bordering the university. Each public university shall make 12the space available at the student union for, and cooperate 13and coordinate with the appropriate election authority in, the 14implementation of this subsection (a).15    (b) (Blank).16    (c) For the purposes of this Section, "public university" 17means the University of Illinois, Illinois State University, 18Chicago State University, Governors State University, Southern 19Illinois University, Northern Illinois University, Eastern 20Illinois University, Western Illinois University, and 21Northeastern Illinois University. 22    (d) For the purposes of this Section, "student union" 23means the Student Center at 750 S. Halsted on the University of 24Illinois-Chicago campus; the Public Affairs Center at the 25University of Illinois at Springfield or a new building 26completed after the effective date of this Act housing student   SB1650- 3 -LRB104 10590 SPS 20666 b1government at the University of Illinois at Springfield; the 2Illini Union at the University of Illinois at 3Urbana-Champaign; the SIUC Student Center at the Southern 4Illinois University at Carbondale campus; the Morris 5University Center at the Southern Illinois University at 6Edwardsville campus; the University Union at the Western 7Illinois University at the Macomb campus; the Holmes Student 8Center at the Northern Illinois University campus; the 9University Union at the Eastern Illinois University campus; 10NEIU Student Union at the Northeastern Illinois University 11campus; the Bone Student Center at the Illinois State 12University campus; the Cordell Reed Student Union at the 13Chicago State University campus; and the Hall of Governors in 14Building D at the Governors State University campus. 15(Source: P.A. 98-115, eff. 7-29-13; 98-691, eff. 7-1-14; 1698-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.)